Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-615
Annulments or dissolutions
of marriage; monthly reports; duty of clerk of district court.

On or before the fifth day of each month, the clerk of the
district court of each county shall make and return to the department, upon
suitable forms furnished by the department, a statement of each action for
annulment or dissolution of marriage granted in the court of which he or she
is clerk during the preceding calendar month. The information requested by the department shall be furnished
by the plaintiff or his or her legal
representative and presented to the clerk of the court with the complaint.
If, after reasonable attempts are made by the plaintiff or his or her legal
representative to attain such information, the information is unavailable,
the designation unknown shall be accepted by the department. If
no annulments or dissolutions of marriage were granted in the county during
the preceding month, a card furnished by the department indicating such information
shall be submitted on or before the fifth day of each month to the department.

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. VI, art. II, div. IX, § 18, p. 785;

C.S.1922, § 8248;

Laws 1927, c. 166, § 11, p. 452;

C.S.1929, § 71-2419;

R.S.1943, § 71-615;

Laws 1959, c. 323, § 3, p. 1181;

Laws 1967, c. 443, § 2, p. 1384;

Laws 1967, c. 444, § 2, p. 1386;

Laws 1977, LB 73, § 2;

Laws 1989, LB 344, § 13;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 526;

Laws 1996, LB 1296, § 28;

Laws 1997, LB 229, § 40;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 415;

Laws 2012, LB904, § 1.